Washington statutes.
RCW 15.14.145

Deposit of funds in planting stock certification account—Use.

All the moneys collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid to the director and deposited in the planting stock certification account within the agricultural local fund and shall be used only to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

[ 1999 c 144 s 14; 1961 c 83 s 13. Formerly RCW 15.14.130.]